North Dakota statutes. TITLE 58 Townships
CHAPTER 58-09 Assessors

58-09-01.
Assessor must be voter and owner of real estate. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1973, ch. 450, § 4; 1973, ch. 492, § 4.

58-09-02.
Compensation of assessor.

The township assessor is entitled to compensation for services in the sum determined by the board of township supervisors for the time actually and necessarily employed in making and completing the assessment of the township and mileage at a rate not exceeding the allowable mileage rate accepted by the United States internal revenue service for each mile [1.61 kilometers] necessarily traveled in the performance of the duties of office. The compensation must be paid out of the township treasury upon an itemized statement setting forth the actual time spent in the work of assessor, approved by the board of township supervisors.

Source:

S.L. 1879, ch. 59, § 55; 1883, ch. 112, sub. ch. 1, § 86; 1889, ch. 126, § 1; R.C. 1895, §§ 2615, 2623; S.L. 1897, ch. 126, § 32; R.C. 1899, §§ 1209, 2615, 2623; S.L. 1903, ch. 36, § 1; R.C. 1905, §§ 1515, 3151, 3159; S.L. 1909, ch. 198, § 1; C.L. 1913, §§ 2125, 4212, 4219; S.L. 1929, ch. 248, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 58-0902; S.L. 1951, ch. 313, § 2; 1953, ch. 311, § 2; 1957 Supp., § 58-0902; S.L. 1973, ch. 450, § 3; 1975, ch. 90, § 8; 1989, ch. 559, § 4; 2001, ch. 554, § 4.

58-09-03.
Assessors — How governed.

The township assessor must be governed by, and shall make assessments and returns as provided in, title 57.

Source:

S.L. 1879, ch. 59, § 55; R.C. 1895, § 2615; R.C. 1899, § 2615; R.C. 1905, § 3151; C.L. 1913, § 4212; R.C. 1943, § 58-0903.

Cross-References.

Examination of state land, see N.D.C.C. § 15-08-02.